Washington statutes.
RCW 4.48.030

To whom reference may be ordered.

A reference may be ordered to any person or persons not exceeding three, agreed upon by the parties. If the reference is not agreed to by the parties, the court may appoint one or more persons, not exceeding three.

[ 1984 c 258 s 514; Code 1881 s 250; 1877 p 51 s 254; 1869 p 61 s 254; 1854 p 168 s 208; RRS s 371.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.